North Carolina, session 2025, HB597.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. State raptor.
The osprey (Pandion haliaetus) is adopted as the official raptor of the State of North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 597-First Edition